Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1257.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 25-217, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE25-217. Ownership of property acquired after moving into state Marital rights in property which that is acquired in this state during marriage by persons married without the state who move into the state shall be controlled by the laws of this state. END_STATUTE